Simple_FST/TrMorph.lexc
!!! TrMorph.lexc !!!
Multichar_Symbols %<N%> %<acc%>

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

kitap Ninf;
kağıt Ninf;
bacak Ninf;
kulak Ninf;
köpek Ninf;
bilek Ninf;
gözlük Ninf;
renk Ninf;
kilit Ninf;
öğüt Ninf;
tat Ninf;
ilaç Ninf;
ağaç Ninf;
dip Ninf;
gök Ninf;
kurt Ninf;
yurt Ninf;
uç Ninf;
çok Ninf;
dolap Ninf;

sabah Ninf;
güneş   Ninf;
ay Ninf;
pazar Ninf;
gün Ninf;
mevsim Ninf;
abaküs Ninf;
adam Ninf;
adım Ninf;
defter Ninf;
telefon Ninf;
mendil Ninf;
kalem Ninf;
insan Ninf;
çöl Ninf;
mücevher Ninf;
sultan Ninf;
tahıl Ninf;
takvim Ninf;
termos Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf

%<N%>:0 #;
%<N%>%<acc%>:^i #;
%<N%>%<acc%>:^ı #;
%<N%>%<acc%>:^u #;
%<N%>%<acc%>:^ü #;
